Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1801
Camper unit, defined.

As used in sections 60-1801 to 60-1808, unless the context otherwise requires, camper unit means any structure designed and intended to be placed on a truck and to provide living quarters and which may be removed from a truck without dismantling or damage when ordinary care is exercised. Camper unit does not include a recreational vehicle as defined in section 60-347, or a mobile home as defined in section 77-3701.

Laws 1969, c. 627, § 1, p. 2526;

Laws 1981, LB 168, § 12;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 259.